Utah statutes.
4-24-14.   Transportation by air or rail -- Brand inspection required --
Application for brand inspection -- Time and place of inspection.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no person may offer, or railroad or
airline company accept, any cattle, calves, horses, domesticated elk, or mules
for transport until they have been brand inspected.
(2)  Before cattle, calves, horses, domesticated elk, or mules are transported
by rail or air, the shipper shall:
(a)  request the department to inspect the brands and marks of the animals
being transported; and
(b)  specify the time and place where the animals may be inspected.
(3)  Cattle, calves, horses, domesticated elk, or mules transported by rail or
air shall be brand inspected:
(a)  at a stockyard or at the initial point of shipment; or
(b)  if approved by the department, at a point or station along the
transportation route.
(4)  The department shall conduct the inspection at the time and place
specified by the shipper or at any other time and place as determined by the
department.
